Utah statutes.
63I-1-236.   Repeal dates, Title 36.

(1)  Section 36-12-20 is repealed June 30, 2018.

(2)  Sections 36-26-101 through 36-26-104 are repealed December 31, 2017.



Amended by Chapter 288, 2013 General Session

